Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1712
Project performance criteria, defined.

Project performance criteria means the performance requirements of the project suitable to allow the design-builder to make a proposal. Performance requirements shall include, but are not limited to, the following, if required by the project: Capacity, durability, standards, ingress and egress requirements, description of the site, surveys, soil and environmental information concerning the site, material quality standards, design and milestone dates, site development requirements, compliance with applicable law, and other criteria for the intended use of the project.

Laws 2018, LB775, § 13.